Florida, session 2026, SB1296.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 134 135 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 136 110.227, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 137 110.227âSuspensions, dismissals, reductions in pay, 138 demotions, layoffs, transfers, and grievances.â 139 (6)âThe following procedures shall apply to appeals filed 140 pursuant to subsection (5) with the Public Employees Relations 141 Commission, hereinafter referred to as the commission: 142 (d)âA recommended order must shall be issued by the hearing 143 officer within 30 days after following the hearing. Exceptions 144 to the recommended order shall be filed within 15 days after the 145 recommended order is issued. The final order must be issued 146 shall be filed by the commission in accordance with ss. 120.569 147 and 120.57 no later than 45 calendar days after the hearing or 148 after the filing of exceptions or oral arguments if granted. 149 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (14) of section 150 112.0455, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 151 112.0455âDrug-Free Workplace Act.â 152 (14)âDISCIPLINE REMEDIES.â 153 (a)âAn executive branch employee who is disciplined or who 154 is a job applicant for another position and is not hired 155 pursuant to this section, may file an appeal with the Public 156 Employees Relations Commission. Any appeal must be filed within 157 30 calendar days after of receipt by the employee or job 158 applicant of notice of discipline or refusal to hire. The notice 159 shall inform the employee or job applicant of the right to file 160 an appeal, or if available, the right to file a collective 161 bargaining grievance pursuant to s. 447.401. Such appeals shall 162 be resolved pursuant to the procedures established in ss. 163 447.207(1)-(4), 447.208(2), and 447.503(4) and (5). A hearing on 164 the appeal must shall be conducted within 60 30 days after of 165 the filing of the appeal, unless an extension is requested by 166 the employee or job applicant and granted by the commission or 167 an arbitrator. The final order must be issued by the commission 168 in accordance with ss. 120.569 and 120.57. 169 Section 3.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (12) of 170 section 120.80, Florida Statutes, to read: 171 120.80âExceptions and special requirements; agencies.â 172 (12)âPUBLIC EMPLOYEES RELATIONS COMMISSION.â 173 (c)âSection 120.60 does not apply to registration of 174 employee organizations under s. 447.305. 175 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 295.14, Florida 176 Statutes, is amended to read: 177 295.14âPenalties.â 178 (1)âWhen the Public Employees Relations Commission, after a 179 hearing on notice conducted according to rules adopted by the 180 commission, determines that a violation of s. 295.07, s. 295.08, 181 s. 295.085, or s. 295.09(1)(a) or (b) has occurred and sustains 182 the veteran seeking redress, the commission shall order the 183 offending agency, employee, or officer of the state to comply 184 with the provisions of s. 295.07, s. 295.08, s. 295.085, or s. 185 295.09(1)(a) or (b); and, in the event of a violation of s. 186 295.07, s. 295.08, s. 295.085, or s. 295.09(1)(a) or (b), the 187 commission may issue an order to compensate the veteran for the 188 loss of any wages and reasonable attorney attorneyâs fees for 189 actual hours worked, and costs of all work, including 190 litigation, incurred as a result of such violation, which order 191 shall be conclusive on the agency, employee, or officer 192 concerned. The attorney attorneyâs fees and costs may not exceed 193 $10,000. The final order must be issued by action of the 194 commission in accordance with ss. 120.569 and 120.57 shall be in 195 writing and shall be served on the parties concerned by 196 certified mail with return receipt requested. 197 Section 5.âSection 447.203, Florida Statutes, is reordered 198 and amended to read: 199 447.203âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 200 (6)(1)ââCommissionâ means the Public Employees Relations 201 Commission created by s. 447.205. 202 (17)(2)ââPublic employerâ or âemployerâ means the state or 203 any county, municipality, or special district or any subdivision 204 or agency thereof which the commission determines has sufficient 205 legal distinctiveness properly to carry out the functions of a 206 public employer. With respect to all public employees determined 207 by the commission as properly belonging to a statewide 208 bargaining unit composed of State Career Service System 209 employees or Selected Professional Service employees, the 210 Governor is deemed to be the public employer; and the Board of 211 Governors of the State University System, or the boardâs 212 designee, is deemed to be the public employer with respect to 213 all public employees of each constituent state university. The 214 board of trustees of a community college is deemed to be the 215 public employer with respect to all employees of the community 216 college. The district school board is deemed to be the public 217 employer with respect to all employees of the school district. 218 The Board of Trustees of the Florida School for the Deaf and the 219 Blind is deemed to be the public employer with respect to the 220 academic and academic administrative personnel of the Florida 221 School for the Deaf and the Blind. The Governor is deemed to be 222 the public employer with respect to all employees in the 223 Correctional Education Program of the Department of Corrections 224 established pursuant to s. 944.801. 225 (16)(3)ââPublic employeeâ means any person employed by a 226 public employer except: 227 (a)âThose persons appointed by the Governor or elected by 228 the people, agency heads, and members of boards and commissions. 229 (b)âThose persons holding positions by appointment or 230 employment in the organized militia. 231 (c)âThose individuals acting as negotiating representatives 232 for employer authorities. 233 (d)âThose persons who are designated by the commission as 234 managerial or confidential employees pursuant to criteria 235 contained herein. 236 (e)âThose persons holding positions of employment with the 237 Florida Legislature. 238 (f)âThose persons who have been convicted of a crime and 239 are inmates confined to institutions within the state. 240 (g)âThose persons appointed to inspection positions in 241 federal/state fruit and vegetable inspection service whose 242 conditions of appointment are affected by the following: 243 1.âFederal license requirement. 244 2.âFederal autonomy regarding investigation and 245 disciplining of appointees. 246 3.âFrequent transfers due to harvesting conditions. 247 (h)âThose persons employed by the Public Employees 248 Relations Commission. 249 (i)âThose persons enrolled as undergraduate students in a 250 state university who perform part-time work for the state 251 university. 252 (12)(4)ââManagerial employeesâ means are those employees 253 who: 254 (a)âPerform jobs that are not of a routine, clerical, or 255 ministerial nature and require the exercise of independent 256 judgment in the performance of such jobs and to whom one or more 257 of the following applies: 258 1.âThey formulate or assist in formulating policies which 259 are applicable to bargaining unit employees. 260 2.âThey may reasonably be required on behalf of the 261 employer to assist in the preparation for the conduct of 262 collective bargaining negotiations. 263 3.âThey have a role in the administration of agreements 264 resulting from collective bargaining negotiations. 265 4.âThey have a significant role in personnel 266 administration. 267 5.âThey have a significant role in employee relations. 268 6.âThey are included in the definition of administrative 269 personnel contained in s. 1012.01(3). 270 7.âThey have a significant role in the preparation or 271 administration of budgets for any public agency or institution 272 or subdivision thereof. 273 (b)âServe as police chiefs, fire chiefs, or directors of 274 public safety of any police, fire, or public safety department. 275 Other police officers, as defined in s. 943.10(1), and 276 firefighters, as defined in s. 633.102, may be determined by the 277 commission to be managerial employees of such departments. In 278 making such determinations, the commission shall consider, in 279 addition to the criteria established in paragraph (a), the 280 paramilitary organizational structure of the department 281 involved. 282 283 However, in determining whether an individual is a managerial 284 employee pursuant to paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), above, the 285 commission may consider historic relationships of the employee 286 to the public employer and to coemployees. 287 (7)(5)ââConfidential employeesâ means are persons who act 288 in a confidential capacity to assist or aid managerial employees 289 as defined in subsection (12) (4). 290 (21)(6)ââStrikeâ means the concerted failure of employees 291 to report for duty; the concerted absence of employees from 292 their positions; the concerted stoppage of work by employees; 293 the concerted submission of resignations by employees; the 294 concerted abstinence in whole or in part by any group of 295 employees from the full and faithful performance of the duties 296 of employment with a public employer for the purpose of 297 inducing, influencing, condoning, or coercing a change in the 298 terms and conditions of employment or the rights, privileges, or 299 obligations of public employment, or participating in a 300 deliberate and concerted course of conduct which adversely 301 affects the services of the public employer; the concerted 302 failure of employees to report for work after the expiration of 303 a collective bargaining agreement; and picketing in furtherance 304 of a work stoppage. The term includes âstrikeâ shall also mean 305 any overt preparation, including, but not limited to, the 306 establishment of strike funds with regard to the above-listed 307 activities listed in this subsection. 308 (22)(7)ââStrike fundsâ means are any appropriations by an 309 employee organization which are established to directly or 310 indirectly aid any employee or employee organization to 311 participate in a strike in the state. 312 (2)(8)ââBargaining unitâ means either that unit determined 313 by the commission, that unit determined through local 314 regulations adopted promulgated pursuant to s. 447.603, or that 315 unit determined by the public employer and the public employee 316 organization and approved by the commission to be appropriate 317 for the purposes of collective bargaining. However, no 318 bargaining unit shall be defined as appropriate which includes 319 employees of two employers that are not departments or divisions 320 of the state, a county, a municipality, or other political 321 entity. 322 (3)(9)ââChief executive officerâ for the state means shall 323 mean the Governor and for other public employers means shall 324 mean the person, whether elected or appointed, who is 325 responsible to the legislative body of the public employer for 326 the administration of the governmental affairs of the public 327 employer. 328 (11)(10)ââLegislative bodyâ means the State Legislature, 329 the board of county commissioners, the district school board, 330 the governing body of a municipality, or the governing body of 331 an instrumentality or unit of government having authority to 332 appropriate funds and establish policy governing the terms and 333 conditions of employment and which, as the case may be, is the 334 appropriate legislative body for the bargaining unit. For 335 purposes of s. 447.403, the Board of Governors of the State 336 University System, or the boardâs designee, shall be deemed to 337 be the legislative body with respect to all employees of each 338 constituent state university. For purposes of s. 447.403, the 339 board of trustees of a community college shall be deemed to be 340 the legislative body with respect to all employees of the 341 community college. 342 (8)(11)ââEmployee organizationâ or âorganizationâ means any 343 labor organization, union, association, fraternal order, 344 occupational or professional society, or group, however 345 organized or constituted, which represents, or seeks to 346 represent, any public employee or group of public employees 347 concerning any matters relating to their employment relationship 348 with a public employer. 349 (9)ââEmployee organization activitiesâ means activities 350 undertaken at the direction of, on behalf of, or to advance the 351 purposes of an employee organization or any parent organization 352 or affiliate of the employee organization by doing any of the 353 following: 354 (a)âSupporting or opposing a candidate for federal, state, 355 or local public office. 356 (b)âInfluencing the passage or defeat of any federal or 357 state legislation or regulation, local ordinance or resolution, 358 or ballot measure. 359 (c)âPromoting or soliciting membership or participation in, 360 or financial support of, an employee organization or any parent 361 organization or affiliate of the employee organization. 362 (d)âSeeking certification as a bargaining agent. 363 (e)âParticipating in the administration, business, or 364 internal governance of an employee organization or any parent 365 organization or affiliate of the employee organization. 366 (f)âPreparing, conducting, or attending employee 367 organization events, conferences, conventions, meetings, or 368 trainings, unless such training is directly related to the 369 performance of a public employeeâs job duties. 370 (g)âDistributing communications of an employee organization 371 or any parent organization or affiliate of the employee 372 organization. 373 (h)âRepresenting or speaking on behalf of an employee 374 organization or any parent organization or affiliate of the 375 employee organization in any setting, venue, or procedure in 376 which the public employer is not a participant. 377 (i)âPreparing, filing, or pursuing unfair labor practice 378 charges or grievances. 379 (j)âRepresenting public employees in investigatory 380 interviews; disciplinary proceedings or appeals, including 381 termination; or other administrative or legal proceedings. 382 (k)âEngaging in collective bargaining and any related 383 mediation, factfinding, or arbitration. 384 (l)âAdministering a collective bargaining agreement. 385 (m)âParticipating in labor-management committees. 386 (1)(12)ââBargaining agentâ means the employee organization 387 that which has been certified by the commission as representing 388 the employees in the bargaining unit, as provided in s. 447.307, 389 or its representative. 390 (13)ââMembership duesâ means any amount a member is 391 required to pay in exchange for membership in an employee 392 organization, including, but not limited to, employee 393 organization dues; uniform assessments; or fees, including 394 initiation fees. 395 (15)(13)ââProfessional employeeâ means: 396 (a)âAny employee engaged in work in any two or more of the 397 following categories: 398 1.âWork predominantly intellectual and varied in character 399 as opposed to routine mental, manual, mechanical, or physical 400 work.; 401 2.âWork involving the consistent exercise of discretion and 402 judgment in its performance.; 403 3.âWork of such a character that the output produced or the 404 result accomplished cannot be standardized in relation to a 405 given period of time.; and 406 4.âWork requiring advanced knowledge in a field of science 407 or learning customarily acquired by a prolonged course of 408 specialized intellectual instruction and study in an institution 409 of higher learning or a hospital, as distinguished from a 410 general academic education, an apprenticeship, or training in 411 the performance of routine mental or physical processes. 412 (b)âAny employee who: 413 1.âHas completed the course of specialized intellectual 414 instruction and study described in subparagraph (a)4. 4. of 415 paragraph (a); and 416 2.âIs performing related work under supervision of a 417 professional person to qualify to become a professional employee 418 as defined in paragraph (a). 419 (5)(14)ââCollective bargainingâ means the performance of 420 the mutual obligations of the public employer and the bargaining 421 agent of the employee organization to meet at reasonable times, 422 to negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written contract 423 with respect to agreements reached concerning the terms and 424 conditions of employment, except that neither party shall be 425 compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a 426 concession unless otherwise provided in this part. 427 (14)(15)ââMembership dues deductionâ means the practice by 428 of a public employer of deducting membership dues and uniform 429 assessments from the salary or wages of a public employee and. 430 Such term also means the practice of a public employer of 431 transmitting the sums so deducted to an such employee 432 organization on behalf of the public employee. 433 (4)(16)ââCivil serviceâ means any career, civil, or merit 434 system used by any public employer. 435 (10)(17)ââGood faith bargainingâ means shall mean, but is 436 not be limited to, the willingness of both parties to meet at 437 reasonable times and places, as mutually agreed upon, in order 438 to discuss issues that which are proper subjects of bargaining, 439 with the intent of reaching a common accord. The term includes 440 It shall include an obligation for both parties to participate 441 actively in the negotiations with an open mind and a sincere 442 desire, as well as making a sincere effort, to resolve 443 differences and come to an agreement. In determining whether a 444 party failed to bargain in good faith, the commission shall 445 consider the total conduct of the parties during negotiations as 446 well as the specific incidents of alleged bad faith. Incidents 447 indicative of bad faith shall include, but not be limited to, 448 the following occurrences: 449 (a)âFailure to meet at reasonable times and places with 450 representatives of the other party for the purpose of 451 negotiations. 452 (b)âPlacing unreasonable restrictions on the other party as 453 a prerequisite to meeting. 454 (c)âFailure to discuss proper subjects of bargaining 455 bargainable issues. 456 (d)âRefusing, upon reasonable written request, to provide 457 public information, excluding work products as defined in s. 458 447.605. 459 (e)âRefusing to negotiate because of an unwanted person on 460 the opposing negotiating team. 461 (f)âNegotiating directly with employees rather than with 462 their certified bargaining agent. 463 (g)âRefusing to reduce a total agreement to writing. 464 (18)ââPublic safety unitâ means a bargaining unit in which 465 the majority of the public employees are employed as a law 466 enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 467 probation officer, as those terms are defined in s. 943.10(1), 468 (2), or (3), respectively; a firefighter as defined in s. 469 633.102(9); a 911 public safety telecommunicator as defined in 470 s. 401.465(1); or an emergency medical technician or a 471 paramedic, as those terms are defined in s. 401.23. 472 (19)ââRepresentational employee organization activitiesâ 473 means those activities specified in paragraphs (9)(i)-(m). 474 (20)ââShowing of interestâ means written statements signed 475 and dated by public employees in a proposed or existing 476 bargaining unit indicating the desire of the public employees 477 either to be represented by the employee organization for 478 purposes of collective bargaining or to no longer be represented 479 by the bargaining agent for purposes of collective bargaining. 480 (23)(18)ââStudent representativeâ means the representative 481 selected by each community college or university student 482 government association. Each representative may be present at 483 all negotiating sessions that take place between the appropriate 484 public employer and a an exclusive bargaining agent. The 485 representative must be enrolled as a student with at least 8 486 credit hours in the respective community college or university 487 during his or her term as student representative. 488 Section 6.âSubsection (8) of section 447.205, Florida 489 Statutes, is amended to read: 490 447.205âPublic Employees Relations Commission.â 491 (8)âThe commission shall have a seal for authentication of 492 its orders and proceedings, upon which shall be inscribed the 493 words âState of Florida-Public Employees Relations Commissionâ 494 âState of FloridaâEmployees Relations Commissionâand which shall 495 be judicially noticed. 496 Section 7.âSubsections (4), (5), (6), and (12) of section 497 447.207, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 498 447.207âCommission; powers and duties.â 499 (4)âAny subpoena, notice of hearing, or other process or 500 notice of the commission issued under the provisions of this 501 part must either shall be served personally or by certified 502 mail, return receipt requested, or be served personally by any 503 person specified by law to serve process or by any person who is 504 not a party and who is 18 years of age or older. When certified 505 mail is used, a returned post office receipt constitutes proof 506 of service. When personal service is used, if the subpoena is 507 not served by a person specified by law to serve process, an 508 affidavit of the person making service constitutes proof of 509 service. A return made and verified by the individual making 510 such service and setting forth the manner of such service is 511 proof of service, and a returned post office receipt, when 512 certified mail is used, is proof of service. All process of any 513 court to which application may be made under the provisions of 514 this part shall be served in the county wherein the persons 515 required to be served reside or may be found. 516 (5)âThe commission shall adopt rules as to the 517 qualifications of persons who may serve as mediators and special 518 magistrates and shall maintain a list lists of such qualified 519 persons who are not employees of the commission. The commission 520 may initiate dispute resolution procedures by special 521 magistrates, pursuant to the provisions of this part. 522 (6)âPursuant to its established procedures, the commission 523 shall resolve questions and controversies concerning claims for 524 recognition as the bargaining agent for a bargaining unit, 525 determine or approve units appropriate for purposes of 526 collective bargaining, expeditiously process charges of unfair 527 labor practices and violations of s. 447.505 by public 528 employees, and resolve such other questions and controversies as 529 it may be authorized herein to undertake. The petitioner, 530 charging party, respondent, and any intervenors shall be the 531 adversary parties before the commission in any adjudicatory 532 proceeding conducted pursuant to this part. Any commission 533 statement of general applicability that implements, interprets, 534 or prescribes law or policy, made in the course of adjudicating 535 a case pursuant to s. 447.307 or s. 447.503 does shall not 536 constitute a rule within the meaning of s. 120.52. 537 (12)âUpon a petition by a public employer after it has been 538 notified by the Department of Labor that the public employerâs 539 protective arrangement covering mass transit employees does not 540 meet the requirements of 49 U.S.C. s. 5333(b) and would 541 jeopardize the public employerâs continued eligibility to 542 receive Federal Transit Administration funding, the commission 543 may waive the application of this part, but only to the extent 544 necessary for the public employer to comply with the 545 requirements of 49 U.S.C. s. 5333(b), any of the following for 546 an employee organization that has been certified as a bargaining 547 agent to represent mass transit employees: 548 (a)âThe prohibition on dues and assessment deductions 549 provided in s. 447.303(1) as it applies to a mass transit 550 employee who has provided a copy of his or her membership 551 authorization form to the employer as part of the authorization 552 of dues deduction under a waiver. 553 (b)âThe requirement to petition the commission for 554 recertification. 555 (c)âThe revocation of certification provided in s. 556 447.305(6) and (7). 557 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and subsection 558 (2) of section 447.301, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 559 447.301âPublic employeesâ rights; organization and 560 representation.â 561 (1) 562 (b)1.âA public employee who desires to be a member of an 563 employee organization must sign and date a membership 564 authorization form, as prescribed by the commission, and submit 565 the executed form to the bargaining agent. 566 2.âThe membership authorization form must identify the name 567 of the bargaining agent; the name of the employee; the class 568 code and class title of the employee; the name of the public 569 employer and employing agency, if applicable; the amount of the 570 membership initiation fee and of the monthly dues which the 571 public employee member must pay; and the names name and amounts 572 total amount of salary, allowances, and other direct or indirect 573 disbursements, including reimbursements, paid to each of the 574 five highest compensated officers and employees of the employee 575 organization disclosed under s. 447.305(2)(d) for the officers 576 and employees receiving the five highest total dollar amounts. 577 3.âThe membership authorization form must contain the 578 following statement in 14-point type: 579 580 As a public employee in the State of Florida, is a 581 right-to-work state. membership or nonmembership non 582 membership in a labor union is not required as a 583 condition of employment., and Union membership and 584 payment of membership union dues and assessments are 585 voluntary. A public employeeâs Each person has the 586 right to join and pay membership dues to a labor union 587 or to refrain from joining and paying membership dues 588 to a labor union is protected by both Floridaâs right 589 to-work law and the First Amendment of the United 590 States Constitution. A public employer may not 591 discriminate against a public No employee may be 592 discriminated against in any manner for joining and 593 financially supporting, a labor union or for refusing 594 to join and or financially support, a labor union. 595 596 4.âA public employee may revoke membership in the employee 597 organization at any time of the year. Within 30 days after Upon 598 receipt of the public employeeâs written revocation of 599 membership, the employee organization must revoke the a public 600 employeeâs membership and cease collection of membership dues 601 for such public employee. The employee organization may not 602 limit a public an employeeâs right to revoke membership to 603 certain dates. If a public employee must complete a form to 604 revoke membership in the employee organization, the form may not 605 require a reason for the public employeeâs decision to revoke 606 his or her membership. 607 5.âAn employee organization must retain for inspection by 608 the commission such membership authorization forms and any 609 revocations. A membership authorization form is valid if it 610 meets the requirements in law at the time it was signed by the 611 employee and if the employeeâs membership has not been 612 subsequently revoked. 613 6.âThis paragraph does not apply to public employees in 614 public safety units members of a bargaining unit the majority of 615 whose employees eligible for representation are employed as law 616 enforcement officers, correctional officers, or correctional 617 probation officers as those terms are defined in s. 943.10(1), 618 (2), or (3), respectively; firefighters as defined in s. 619 633.102; 911 public safety telecommunicators as defined in s. 620 401.465(1)(a); or emergency medical technicians or paramedics as 621 defined in s. 401.23. 622 7.âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 623 paragraph. 624 (2)âPublic employees shall have the right to be represented 625 by any employee organization of their own choosing and to 626 negotiate collectively, through a certified bargaining agent, 627 with their public employer in the determination of the terms and 628 conditions of their employment. Public employees shall have the 629 right to be represented in the determination of grievances on 630 all terms and conditions of their employment. Public employees 631 shall have the right to refrain from exercising the right to be 632 represented. 633 Section 9.âSection 447.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to 634 read: 635 447.303âMembership dues; deduction and collection.â 636 (1)âExcept as authorized in subsection (2) or subject to a 637 waiver of the prohibition on membership dues deduction granted 638 pursuant to s. 447.207(12), a public employer may not engage in 639 membership dues deduction on behalf of s. 447.207(12)(a), an 640 employee organization that has been certified as a bargaining 641 agent may not have its dues and uniform assessments deducted and 642 collected by the employer from the salaries of those employees 643 in the unit. A public employee may pay membership dues and 644 uniform assessments directly to the employee organization, any 645 parent organization of the employee organization, or any 646 affiliate of either the employee organization or the parent 647 organization that has been certified as the bargaining agent. 648 (2)(a)âUpon the written authorization of a public employee 649 in a public safety unit, the public employer must engage in 650 membership dues deduction for such public employee. A public 651 employee may revoke his or her authorization for membership dues 652 deduction upon providing 30 daysâ written notice to the public 653 employer and bargaining agent An employee organization that has 654 been certified as a bargaining agent to represent a bargaining 655 unit the majority of whose employees eligible for representation 656 are employed as law enforcement officers, correctional officers, 657 or correctional probation officers as those terms are defined in 658 s. 943.10(1), (2), or (3), respectively; firefighters as defined 659 in s. 633.102; 911 public safety telecommunicators as defined in 660 s. 401.465(1)(a); or emergency medical technicians or paramedics 661 as defined in s. 401.23 has the right to have its dues and 662 uniform assessments for that bargaining unit deducted and 663 collected by the employer from the salaries of those employees 664 who authorize the deduction and collection of said dues and 665 uniform assessments. However, such authorization is revocable at 666 the employeeâs request upon 30 daysâ written notice to the 667 employer and employee organization. Said deductions shall 668 commence upon the bargaining agentâs written request to the 669 employer. 670 (b)âReasonable costs to the public employer of engaging in 671 membership dues said deductions is a proper subject of 672 collective bargaining. 673 (c)âThe requirement to engage in membership dues deductions 674 Such right to deduction, unless revoked under s. 447.507, is in 675 force as for so long as the employee organization remains the 676 certified bargaining agent remains certified to represent for 677 the public employees in the bargaining unit. 678 (3)âThe public employer is expressly prohibited from any 679 involvement in the collection of fines, penalties, or special 680 assessments. 681 Section 10.âSection 447.305, Florida Statutes, is amended 682 to read: 683 447.305âRegistration of employee organizations 684 organization.â 685 (1)âEvery employee organization seeking to become a 686 certified bargaining agent for public employees shall register 687 with the commission before pursuant to the procedures set forth 688 in s. 120.60 prior to requesting recognition by a public 689 employer for purposes of collective bargaining and prior to 690 submitting a certification, recertification, or unit 691 clarification petition to the commission requesting 692 certification as an exclusive bargaining agent. Further, If an 693 such employee organization is not registered, it may not 694 participate in a certification, recertification, or unit 695 clarification representation hearing;, participate in a 696 certification or recertification representation election;, or be 697 certified as a an exclusive bargaining agent. The application 698 for registration required by this section must shall be under 699 oath and in such form as the commission may prescribe, and must 700 shall include all of the following: 701 (a)âThe name and address of the organization and of any 702 parent organization or affiliate of the employee organization 703 with which it is affiliated. 704 (b)âThe names and addresses of the principal officers and 705 all representatives of the organization. 706 (c)âThe amount of the initiation fee and the amount and 707 collection frequency of the membership dues and uniform 708 assessments that a member of the organization must pay. 709 (d)âThe current annual financial statement of the 710 organization, prepared by an independent certified public 711 accountant licensed under chapter 473. 712 (e)âThe name of its business agent, if any; if different 713 from the business agent, the name of its local agent for service 714 of process; and the addresses where such person or persons can 715 be reached. 716 (f)âA pledge, in a form prescribed by the commission, that 717 the employee organization will conform to the laws of this the 718 state and that it will accept members without regard to age, 719 race, sex, religion, or national origin. 720 (g)âA copy of the current constitution and bylaws of the 721 employee organization. 722 (h)âA copy of the current constitution and bylaws of the 723 state and national groups with which the employee organization 724 is affiliated or associated. In lieu of this provision, and upon 725 adoption of a rule by the commission, a state or national 726 affiliate or parent organization of any registering employee 727 labor organization may annually submit a copy of its current 728 constitution and bylaws. 729 (2)âA registration granted to an employee organization 730 pursuant to this section runs for 1 year after from the date of 731 issuance. A registration must be renewed annually by filing an 732 application for renewal under oath with the commission, which 733 application must reflect any changes in the information provided 734 to the commission in conjunction with the employee 735 organizationâs preceding application for registration or 736 previous renewal, whichever is applicable. Each application for 737 renewal of registration must include a current annual financial 738 statement, prepared by an independent certified public 739 accountant licensed under chapter 473 and signed by the employee 740 organizationâs president and treasurer or corresponding 741 principal officers, containing the following information in such 742 detail as may be necessary to accurately to disclose its 743 financial condition and operations for its preceding fiscal year 744 and in all of the following such categories as prescribed by the 745 commission may prescribe: 746 (a)âAssets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the 747 fiscal year.; 748 (b)âReceipts of any kind and the sources thereof.; 749 (c)âDisbursements by category.; 750 (d)âSalary, wages, fringe benefits, allowances, and other 751 direct or indirect disbursements, including reimbursed expenses, 752 paid or accruing to each of its officers officer and also to 753 each of its employees employee who, during such fiscal year, 754 received more than $10,000 in the aggregate from such employee 755 organization and any parent organization of the other employee 756 organization or any affiliate of either the employee 757 organization or the parent organization. This paragraph requires 758 reporting of any reimbursements paid by the employee 759 organization to a public employer for moneys paid by the public 760 employer to the employee organizationâs officers or employees. 761 affiliated with it or with which it is affiliated or which is 762 affiliated with the same national or international employee 763 organization; 764 (e)âDirect and indirect loans made to any of its officers 765 officer, employees employee, or members member which aggregated 766 more than $250 during the fiscal year, together with a statement 767 of the purpose, security, if any, and arrangements for 768 repayment.; and 769 (f)âDirect and indirect loans to any business enterprise, 770 together with a statement of the purpose, security, if any, and 771 arrangements for repayment. 772 (g)âThe amount of membership dues retained by or 773 distributed to the employee organization, any parent 774 organization of the employee organization, and any affiliate of 775 either the employee organization or the parent organization. 776 (3)âAs part of its application for renewal of registration, 777 a In addition to subsection (2), an employee organization that 778 has been certified as the bargaining agent for public employees 779 must include all of for each such certified bargaining unit the 780 following information and documentation as of the 30th day 781 immediately preceding the date upon which its current 782 registration is scheduled to end for any renewal of registration 783 on or after October 1, 2023: 784 (a)âFor each bargaining unit for which the bargaining agent 785 is certified, the certification number assigned to the 786 bargaining unit by the commission. 787 (b)(a)âFor each certification, the number of public 788 employees in the bargaining unit who are eligible for 789 representation by the employee organization. 790 (c)âFor each certification, the number of public employees 791 in the bargaining unit who paid full membership dues sufficient 792 to maintain membership in good standing in the bargaining agent. 793 (d)(b)âFor each certification, the number of public 794 employees in the bargaining unit who have submitted signed 795 membership authorization forms without a subsequent revocation 796 of such membership. 797 (c)âThe number of employees in the bargaining unit who paid 798 dues to the employee organization. 799 (d)âThe number of employees in the bargaining unit who did 800 not pay dues to the employee organization. 801 (e)âAn agreed-upon procedures report performed 802 Documentation provided by an independent certified public 803 accountant retained by the employee organization which verifies 804 to assist in determining the accuracy of the information 805 provided in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) (a)-(d). The agreed 806 upon procedures must be conducted in accordance with attestation 807 standards established by the American Institute of Certified 808 Public Accountants. 809 (4)âWithin 30 days after filing an application for renewal 810 of registration with the commission, the employee organization 811 must provide a copy of its application for renewal of 812 registration relating to a public employerâs employees to the 813 public employer and public employees of each bargaining unit for 814 which the employee organization is the bargaining agent on the 815 same day the application is submitted to the commission. 816 (5)âAn application for renewal of registration is 817 incomplete and is not eligible for consideration by The 818 commission must notify the bargaining agent if it does not 819 include all of the information and documentation required in 820 subsection (3) is incomplete. The bargaining agent must provide 821 the missing information to the commission within 30 days after 822 such notification. If the bargaining agent fails to provide the 823 missing information within 30 days after notification, the 824 commission must dismiss the application The commission shall 825 notify the employee organization if the application is 826 incomplete. An incomplete application must be dismissed if the 827 required information and documentation are not provided within 828 10 days after the employee organization receives such notice. 829 (6)âThe commission must notify the bargaining agent when 830 the information required in subsection (3) is complete. Within 831 30 days after such notification, the bargaining agent must 832 petition for recertification pursuant to s. 447.307 for each of 833 its bargaining units Notwithstanding the provisions of this 834 chapter relating to collective bargaining, an employee 835 organization certified as a bargaining agent to represent a 836 bargaining unit for which less than 60 percent of the public 837 unit employees in the bargaining unit have submitted membership 838 authorization forms without subsequent revocation and paid 839 membership dues to the organization, as reported under 840 subsection (3) during its last registration period must petition 841 the commission pursuant to s. 447.307(2) and (3) for 842 recertification as the exclusive representative of all employees 843 in the bargaining unit within 30 days after the date on which 844 the employee organization applies for renewal of registration 845 pursuant to subsection (2). The certification of an employee 846 organization that does not comply with this section is revoked. 847 (7)âIf the public employer or a public employee of a 848 bargaining unit represented by a bargaining agent believes that 849 the bargaining agentâs employee may challenge an employee 850 organizationâs application for renewal of registration is 851 materially inaccurate, if the public employer or public 852 bargaining unit employee may challenge believes that the 853 application as materially is inaccurate during the pendency of 854 the application or, if the registration renewal has been 855 granted, before the date upon which the bargaining agentâs 856 current registration is scheduled to end. If a challenge is 857 filed, the commission or one of its designated agents must 858 conduct an investigation pursuant to subsection (8) shall review 859 the application to determine its accuracy and compliance with 860 this section. If the commission finds that the application is 861 inaccurate or does not comply with this section, the commission 862 shall revoke the registration and certification of the employee 863 organization. 864 (8)âThe commission or one of its designated agents may 865 conduct an investigation to confirm the validity of any 866 information submitted pursuant to this section. The commission 867 may revoke or deny an employee organizationâs registration or 868 certification if it finds that the employee organization: 869 (a)âFailed to cooperate with the investigation conducted 870 pursuant to this subsection, including refusal to permit the 871 commission or one of its designated agents to inspect membership 872 authorization forms or revocations pursuant to s. 873 447.301(1)(b)5.; or 874 (b)âIntentionally misrepresented the information it 875 submitted pursuant to this section. 876 877 A decision issued by the commission pursuant to this subsection 878 is a final agency action that is reviewable pursuant to s. 879 447.504. 880 (9)âAn employee organization is exempt from the 881 requirements of subsections (3)-(8) and (12) for each public 882 safety unit it represents only with respect to the circumstances 883 of each bargaining unit the majority of whose employees eligible 884 for representation are employed as law enforcement officers, 885 correctional officers, or correctional probation officers as 886 those terms are defined in s. 943.10(1), (2), or (3), 887 respectively; firefighters as defined in s. 633.102; 911 public 888 safety telecommunicators as defined in s. 401.465(1)(a); or 889 emergency medical technicians or paramedics as defined in s. 890 401.23. 891 (10)âA registration fee must shall accompany each 892 application for registration or renewal of registration filed 893 with the commission. The registration fee may amount charged for 894 an application for registration or renewal of registration shall 895 not exceed $15. All such money collected by the commission shall 896 be deposited in the General Revenue Fund. 897 (11)âEvery employee organization shall keep accurate 898 accounts of its income and expenses, which accounts must shall 899 be open for inspection at a all reasonable time and place times 900 by any member of the organization or by the commission. In 901 addition, each employee organization that has been certified as 902 a bargaining agent must provide to its members an annual 903 financial report prepared by an independent certified public 904 accountant licensed under chapter 473 that includes a detailed 905 breakdown of revenues and expenditures in such categories as the 906 commission may prescribe, and an accounting of membership dues 907 and assessments. The employee organization must notify its 908 members annually of all costs of membership. 909 (12)âThe certification of an employee organization that 910 does not comply with this section is revoked. An employee 911 organization that has its certification revoked under this 912 subsection may not file a petition for certification under s. 913 447.307 which covers any of the public employees in the 914 bargaining unit described in the revoked certification for at 915 least 12 months after the date the certification was revoked. 916 (13)âA decision issued by the commission under this section 917 is a final agency action that is reviewable pursuant to s. 918 447.504. 919 Section 11.âSection 447.307, Florida Statutes, is amended 920 to read: 921 447.307âCertification and recertification of employee 922 organizations organization.â 923 (1)(a)âAn Any employee organization seeking certification 924 or recertification as a bargaining agent must file a petition 925 with the commission accompanied by a showing of interest from at 926 least 30 percent of the public employees in the proposed or 927 existing bargaining unit. The showing of interest statements 928 must be signed and dated by the public employees not more than 929 12 months before the filing of which is designated or selected 930 by a majority of public employees in an appropriate unit as 931 their representative for purposes of collective bargaining shall 932 request recognition by the public employer. The public employer 933 shall, if satisfied as to the majority status of the employee 934 organization and the appropriateness of the proposed unit, 935 recognize the employee organization as the collective bargaining 936 representative of employees in the designated unit. Upon 937 recognition by a public employer, the employee organization 938 shall immediately petition the commission for certification. The 939 commission shall review only the appropriateness of the unit 940 proposed by the employee organization. If the unit is 941 appropriate according to the criteria used in this part, the 942 commission shall immediately certify the employee organization 943 as the exclusive representative of all employees in the unit. If 944 the unit is inappropriate according to the criteria used in this 945 part, the commission may dismiss the petition. 946 (b)âWhenever a public employer recognizes an employee 947 organization on the basis of majority status and on the basis of 948 appropriateness in accordance with subparagraph (4)(f)5., the 949 commission shall, in the absence of inclusion of a prohibited 950 category of employees or violation of s. 447.501, certify the 951 proposed unit. 952 (b)(2)âA If the public employer refuses to recognize the 953 employee organization, the employee organization may file a 954 petition with the commission for certification as the bargaining 955 agent for a proposed bargaining unit. The petition shall be 956 accompanied by dated statements signed by at least 30 percent of 957 the employees in the proposed unit, indicating that such 958 employees desire to be represented for purposes of collective 959 bargaining by the petitioning employee organization. Once a 960 petition for certification has been filed by an employee 961 organization, any registered employee organization desiring 962 placement on the ballot in any certification or recertification 963 election to be conducted pursuant to this section may be 964 permitted by the commission to intervene in the proceeding upon 965 a motion accompanied by a showing of interest from dated 966 statements signed by at least 10 percent of the public employees 967 in the proposed or existing bargaining unit, indicating that 968 such employees desire to be represented for the purposes of 969 collective bargaining by the moving employee organization. The 970 showing of interest petitions and dated statements must be 971 signed and dated by the public employees not more than 12 months 972 before the filing of the petition. 973 (c)âThe showing of interest is are confidential and exempt 974 from the provisions of s. 119.07(1), except that any public 975 employee, public employer, or employee organization having 976 sufficient reason to believe that the showing of interest was 977 any of the employee signatures were obtained by collusion, 978 coercion, intimidation, or misrepresentation or is are otherwise 979 invalid shall be given a reasonable opportunity to verify and 980 challenge the showing of interest signatures appearing on the 981 petition. 982 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), if any employees in the 983 proposed unit are included in a bargaining unit for which there 984 is a bargaining agent currently certified by the commission, 985 such bargaining agent will be automatically added as a party to 986 the case and may appear on the ballot without being required to 987 file a motion to intervene or a showing of interest. 988 (2)(a)âA certification petition may not be filed regarding 989 any proposed or existing bargaining unit within 12 months after 990 the date the commission issues an order that verifies the 991 results of a certification, recertification, or decertification 992 election covering any of the public employees in the proposed or 993 existing bargaining unit. 994 (b)âIf a valid collective bargaining agreement covering any 995 of the public employees in a proposed or existing bargaining 996 unit is in effect, a certification petition may only be filed 997 with the commission at least 90 but not more than 150 days 998 immediately preceding the expiration date of the collective 999 bargaining agreement, or at any time subsequent to such 1000 agreementâs expiration date but before the effective date of a 1001 new collective bargaining agreement. The effective date of a 1002 collective bargaining agreement is the date of ratification of 1003 such agreement by both parties if such agreement becomes 1004 effective immediately or retroactively, or the collective 1005 bargaining agreementâs actual effective date if such agreement 1006 becomes effective after its ratification date. 1007 (3)(a)âThe commission or one of its designated agents shall 1008 investigate a certification or recertification the petition to 1009 determine its sufficiency; if it has reasonable cause to believe 1010 that the petition is sufficient, the commission shall provide 1011 for an appropriate hearing upon due notice. Such a hearing may 1012 be conducted by an agent of the commission. If the commission 1013 finds that the petition is to be insufficient, the commission 1014 must it may dismiss the petition. If the commission finds upon 1015 the record of the hearing that the petition is sufficient, the 1016 commission must it shall immediately: 1017 (a)1.âDefine the proposed or existing bargaining unit and 1018 determine which public employees are shall be qualified and 1019 entitled to vote at any election held by the commission. Upon 1020 providing due notice, the commission may provide for a hearing. 1021 (b)âConduct elections by mail, on site, or by any combined 1022 method ordered or approved by the commission. 1023 1.âIn determining the method of election and timing, the 1024 commission shall consider all of the following factors: 1025 a.âThe number of eligible voters in the bargaining unit. 1026 b.âThe number of work locations and availability of polling 1027 locations. 1028 c.âThe size of the public employerâs operations. 1029 d.âThe cost to the commission and parties to conduct the 1030 election. 1031 e.âThe commissionâs workload and election schedule. 1032 f.âThe work schedules and shifts of the eligible voters. 1033 g.âWhether the parties agree on a time to hold the election 1034 and the method of election to be used. 1035 h.âAny other factors that might impact the integrity of the 1036 election. 1037 2.âNotwithstanding subparagraph 1., if one of the parties 1038 to the election requests an election by mail, the commission 1039 must conduct the election by mail. An election by mail must be 1040 conducted no earlier than 4 weeks after the postmark date on the 1041 ballot mailed by the commission. Notice of an election by mail 1042 must be provided by the commission to the bargaining agent, the 1043 public employer, and the public employees in the bargaining unit 1044 at least 4 weeks before the date of the election. 1045 (c)2.âIdentify the public employer or employers for 1046 purposes of collective bargaining with the bargaining agent. 1047 (d)3.âOrder an election by secret ballot, the cost of said 1048 election and any required runoff election to be borne equally by 1049 the parties, except as the commission may provide by rule. An 1050 election conducted by mail ballot must include, subject to 1051 appropriation, return envelopes with prepaid postage affixed. 1052 The commissionâs order assessing costs of an election may be 1053 enforced pursuant to the provisions of this part. 1054 (4)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), elections are 1055 determined as follows for all certification or recertification 1056 petitions filed on or after July 1, 2026: 1057 1.(b)âIf at least 50 percent of the public employees in the 1058 bargaining unit as of the date set by the commission participate 1059 in the election, and at least 50 percent of the public employees 1060 voting in the election select an employee organization When an 1061 employee organization is selected by a majority of the employees 1062 voting in an election, the commission must shall certify or 1063 recertify the employee organization as the exclusive collective 1064 bargaining agent for the public representative of all employees 1065 in the unit. 1066 2.âA runoff election must be held according to rules 1067 adopted by the commission if, in the election conducted under 1068 subparagraph 1., there was more than one employee organization 1069 on the ballot, at least 50 percent of the employees in the 1070 bargaining unit participated in the election, and none of the 1071 choices on the ballot received a vote of 50 percent of the 1072 public employees who voted in the election. 1073 (b)âCertification elections involving public safety units 1074 are determined as follows: 1075 1.âIf an employee organization is selected by a majority 1076 vote of the public employees voting in the election, the 1077 commission must certify the employee organization as the 1078 bargaining agent for the public employees in the bargaining 1079 unit. 1080 2.âA runoff election must be held according to rules 1081 adopted by the commission if, in the election conducted under 1082 subparagraph 1., there was more than one employee organization 1083 on the ballot and none of the choices on the ballot received a 1084 majority vote of the public employees voting in the election. 1085 (c)âCertification, recertification, or revocation under 1086 this section is effective upon the issuance of a the final order 1087 by the commission or, if the final order is appealed, at the 1088 time the appeal is exhausted or any stay is vacated by the 1089 commission or a the court. 1090 (c)âIn any election in which none of the choices on the 1091 ballot receives the vote of a majority of the employees voting, 1092 a runoff election shall be held according to rules promulgated 1093 by the commission. 1094 (d)âNo petition may be filed seeking an election in any 1095 proposed or existing appropriate bargaining unit to determine 1096 the exclusive bargaining agent within 12 months after the date 1097 of a commission order verifying a representation election or, if 1098 an employee organization prevails, within 12 months after the 1099 date of an effective certification covering any of the employees 1100 in the proposed or existing bargaining unit. Furthermore, if a 1101 valid collective bargaining agreement covering any of the 1102 employees in a proposed unit is in effect, a petition for 1103 certification may be filed with the commission only during the 1104 period extending from 150 days to 90 days immediately preceding 1105 the expiration date of that agreement, or at any time subsequent 1106 to its expiration date but prior to the effective date of any 1107 new agreement. The effective date of a collective bargaining 1108 agreement means the date of ratification by both parties, if the 1109 agreement becomes effective immediately or retroactively; or its 1110 actual effective date, if the agreement becomes effective after 1111 its ratification date. 1112 (5)(4)âIn defining a proposed bargaining unit, the 1113 commission shall take into consideration: 1114 (a)âThe principles of efficient administration of 1115 government. 1116 (b)âThe number of employee organizations with which the 1117 employer might have to negotiate. 1118 (c)âThe compatibility of the unit with the joint 1119 responsibilities of the public employer and public employees to 1120 represent the public. 1121 (d)âThe power of the officials of government at the level 1122 of the unit to agree, or make effective recommendations to 1123 another administrative authority or to a legislative body, with 1124 respect to matters of employment upon which the employee desires 1125 to negotiate. 1126 (e)âThe organizational structure of the public employer. 1127 (f)âCommunity of interest among the employees to be 1128 included in the unit, considering: 1129 1.âThe manner in which wages and other terms of employment 1130 are determined. 1131 2.âThe method by which jobs and salary classifications are 1132 determined. 1133 3.âThe interdependence of jobs and interchange of 1134 employees. 1135 4.âThe desires of the employees. 1136 5.âThe history of employee relations within the 1137 organization of the public employer concerning organization and 1138 negotiation and the interest of the employees and the employer 1139 in the continuation of a traditional, workable, and accepted 1140 negotiation relationship. 1141 (g)âThe statutory authority of the public employer to 1142 administer a classification and pay plan. 1143 (h)âSuch other factors and policies as the commission may 1144 deem appropriate. 1145 1146 However, a bargaining no unit may not shall be established or 1147 approved for purposes of collective bargaining which includes 1148 both professional and nonprofessional employees unless a 1149 majority of each group votes for inclusion in such bargaining 1150 unit. 1151 Section 12.âSection 447.3076, Florida Statutes, is created 1152 to read: 1153 447.3076âClarification of bargaining units.â 1154 (1)âA petition to clarify the composition of a bargaining 1155 unit may be filed with the commission when significant changes 1156 in statutory law or case law require clarification of the 1157 bargaining unit or when a classification was: 1158 (a)âCreated or substantially changed after the unit was 1159 initially defined by the commission; 1160 (b)âRetitled with no substantial change in job duties; or 1161 (c)âIncluded or excluded through inadvertence or 1162 misunderstanding by the commission. 1163 (2)âA bargaining unit clarification petition may be filed 1164 by the bargaining agent for the bargaining unit or by the public 1165 employer of the public employees in the unit. 1166 (3)âA copy of the petition must be served on the public 1167 employer and any bargaining agent that is certified to represent 1168 any employee or classification which may be substantially 1169 affected by the proposed bargaining unit clarification. 1170 (4)âIf any substantially affected employees are not 1171 represented by a bargaining agent, the public employer must 1172 provide a copy of the petition to those employees within 10 days 1173 after the filing of the petition. 1174 (5)âWhen the clarification of a bargaining unit would 1175 result in an increase in the size of the bargaining unit by more 1176 than 25 percent, the unit clarification petition raises a 1177 question concerning representation and must be dismissed. 1178 Section 13.âSection 447.308, Florida Statutes, is amended 1179 to read: 1180 447.308âDecertification Revocation of certification of 1181 employee organizations organization.â 1182 (1)âA public Any employee or group of public employees 1183 which no longer desires to be represented by a the certified 1184 bargaining agent may file with the commission a petition to 1185 decertify the bargaining agent revoke certification. The 1186 petition must shall be accompanied by a showing of interest from 1187 dated statements signed by at least 30 percent of the public 1188 employees in the bargaining unit, indicating that such employees 1189 no longer desire to be represented for purposes of collective 1190 bargaining by the certified bargaining agent. The time of filing 1191 said petition shall be governed by the provisions of s. 1192 447.307(3)(d) relating to petitions for certification. The 1193 showing of interest statements must be signed and dated by the 1194 public employees not more than 12 months before the filing of 1195 the petition. Any employee, employer, or employee organization 1196 having sufficient reason to believe that the showing of interest 1197 was any of the employee signatures were obtained by collusion, 1198 coercion, intimidation, or misrepresentation or is are otherwise 1199 invalid shall be given a reasonable opportunity to verify and 1200 challenge the showing of interest signatures appearing on the 1201 petition. 1202 (2)(a)âA decertification petition may not be filed 1203 regarding the bargaining unit within 12 months after the date 1204 the commission issues an order that verifies the results of a 1205 certification, recertification, or decertification election 1206 covering any of the public employees in the unit. 1207 (b)âIf a valid collective bargaining agreement covering any 1208 of the public employees in the bargaining unit is in effect, a 1209 decertification petition may only be filed with the commission 1210 at least 90 but not more than 150 days immediately preceding the 1211 expiration date of the collective bargaining agreement, or at 1212 any time after such agreementâs expiration date but before the 1213 effective date of a new collective bargaining agreement. The 1214 effective date of a collective bargaining agreement is the date 1215 of ratification of such agreement by both parties if such 1216 agreement becomes effective immediately or retroactively, or the 1217 collective bargaining agreementâs actual effective date if such 1218 agreement becomes effective after its ratification date. 1219 (3)âThe commission or one of its designated agents shall 1220 investigate the decertification petition to determine its 1221 sufficiency. If the commission finds that the petition is to be 1222 insufficient, the commission must it may dismiss the petition. 1223 If the commission finds that the petition is sufficient, the 1224 commission must it shall immediately: 1225 (a)âIdentify the bargaining unit and determine which public 1226 employees shall be qualified and entitled to vote in the 1227 election held by the commission. 1228 (b)âIdentify the public employer or employers of the 1229 bargaining unit. 1230 (c)âOrder an election by secret ballot, the cost of said 1231 election to be borne equally by the parties, except as the 1232 commission may provide by rule. An election conducted by mail 1233 ballot must include, subject to appropriation, return envelopes 1234 with prepaid postage affixed. The commissionâs order assessing 1235 costs of an election may be enforced pursuant to the provisions 1236 of this part. 1237 (4)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), elections are 1238 determined as follows for all decertification petitions filed on 1239 or after July 1, 2026: 1240 1.âIf at least 50 percent of the public employees in the 1241 bargaining unit as of the date set by the commission participate 1242 in the election, and at least 50 percent of the public employees 1243 voting in the election vote to decertify an employee 1244 organization, the commission must revoke the bargaining agentâs 1245 certification for that bargaining unit. 1246 2.âIf decertification is not selected by at least 50 1247 percent of the public employees voting in the election, and at 1248 least 50 percent of the employees who are in the bargaining unit 1249 as of the date set by the commission participate in the 1250 election, the bargaining agent must retain its certification for 1251 that bargaining unit. 1252 (b)âDecertification elections involving public safety units 1253 are determined as follows: 1254 1.(2)âIf decertification is selected by a majority vote of 1255 the public employees voting in the such election vote against 1256 the continuation of representation by the certified bargaining 1257 agent, the commission must revoke the certification of the 1258 employee organization as the exclusive bargaining agentâs 1259 certification for that agent for the employees in the bargaining 1260 unit shall be revoked. 1261 2.(3)âIf decertification is not selected by a majority vote 1262 of the public employees voting in the such election do not vote 1263 against the continuation of representation by the certified 1264 bargaining agent, the bargaining agent must retain its 1265 certification for that bargaining of the employee organization 1266 as the exclusive bargaining agent for the employees in the unit 1267 shall be retained by the organization. 1268 (c)âRevocation under this section is effective upon the 1269 issuance of a final order by the commission or, if the final 1270 order is appealed, at the time the appeal is exhausted or any 1271 stay is vacated by the commission or a court. 1272 Section 14.âSection 447.309, Florida Statutes, is amended 1273 to read: 1274 447.309âCollective bargaining; approval or rejection.â 1275 (1)âAfter an employee organization has been certified as 1276 the bargaining agent of a bargaining unit pursuant to the 1277 provisions of this part, the bargaining agent for the 1278 organization and the chief executive officer of the appropriate 1279 public employer or employers, jointly, shall bargain 1280 collectively in the determination of the wages, hours, and terms 1281 and conditions of employment of the public employees within the 1282 bargaining unit. The chief executive officer or his or her 1283 representative and the bargaining agent or its representative 1284 shall meet at reasonable times and bargain in good faith. In 1285 conducting negotiations with the bargaining agent, the chief 1286 executive officer or his or her representative shall consult 1287 with, and attempt to represent the views of, the legislative 1288 body of the public employer. Any collective bargaining agreement 1289 reached by the negotiators must shall be reduced to writing, and 1290 such agreement must shall be signed by the chief executive 1291 officer and the bargaining agent. Any agreement signed by the 1292 chief executive officer and the bargaining agent is shall not be 1293 binding on the public employer until such agreement has been 1294 ratified by the public employer and the by public employees in 1295 who are members of the bargaining unit, subject to the 1296 provisions of subsections (2) and (3). However, with respect to 1297 statewide bargaining units, any agreement signed by the Governor 1298 and the bargaining agent for such a bargaining unit is shall not 1299 be binding until approved by the public employees in who are 1300 members of the bargaining unit, subject to the provisions of 1301 subsections (2) and (3). 1302 (2)(a)âUpon execution of the collective bargaining 1303 agreement, the chief executive shall, in his or her annual 1304 budget request or by other appropriate means, request the 1305 legislative body to appropriate such amounts as shall be 1306 sufficient to fund the provisions of the collective bargaining 1307 agreement. 1308 (b)âIf the state is a party to a collective bargaining 1309 agreement in which less than the requested amount is 1310 appropriated by the Legislature, the collective bargaining 1311 agreement shall be administered on the basis of the amounts 1312 appropriated by the Legislature. The failure of the Legislature 1313 to appropriate funds sufficient to fund the collective 1314 bargaining agreement does shall not constitute, or be evidence 1315 of, any unfair labor practice. All collective bargaining 1316 agreements entered into by the state are subject to the 1317 appropriations powers of the Legislature, and the provisions of 1318 this section may shall not conflict with the exclusive authority 1319 of the Legislature to appropriate funds. 1320 (3)âIf any provision of a collective bargaining agreement 1321 is in conflict with any law, ordinance, rule, or regulation over 1322 which the chief executive officer has no amendatory power, the 1323 chief executive officer shall submit to the appropriate 1324 governmental body having amendatory power a proposed amendment 1325 to such law, ordinance, rule, or regulation. Unless and until 1326 such amendment is enacted or adopted and becomes effective, the 1327 conflicting provision of the collective bargaining agreement may 1328 shall not become effective. 1329 (4)âIf the agreement is not ratified by the public employer 1330 or is not approved by a majority vote of the public employees 1331 voting in the unit, in accordance with procedures adopted by the 1332 commission, the agreement must shall be returned to the chief 1333 executive officer and the bargaining agent employee organization 1334 for further negotiations. 1335 (5)âA Any collective bargaining agreement may shall not 1336 provide for a term of existence of more than 3 years and must 1337 shall contain all of the terms and conditions of employment of 1338 the employees in the bargaining unit during such term except 1339 those terms and conditions provided for in applicable merit and 1340 civil service rules and regulations. 1341 Section 15.âSection 447.401, Florida Statutes, is amended 1342 to read: 1343 447.401âGrievance procedures.âEach public employer and 1344 bargaining agent shall negotiate a grievance procedure to be 1345 used for the settlement of disputes between a public employer 1346 and a public employee, or a group of public employees, involving 1347 the interpretation or application of a collective bargaining 1348 agreement. The Such grievance procedure must shall have as its 1349 terminal step a final and binding disposition by an impartial 1350 neutral arbitrator, mutually selected by the parties; however, 1351 when the issue under appeal is an allegation of abuse, 1352 abandonment, or neglect of a child by a public an employee under 1353 s. 39.201 or an allegation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of 1354 a vulnerable adult by a public employee under s. 415.1034, the 1355 grievance may not be decided until such allegation the abuse, 1356 abandonment, or neglect of a child has been judicially 1357 determined. However, an arbitrator arbiter or other neutral 1358 party may shall not have the power to add to, subtract from, 1359 modify, or alter the terms of a collective bargaining agreement. 1360 If an employee organization is certified as the bargaining agent 1361 of a bargaining unit, the grievance procedure then in existence 1362 may be the subject of collective bargaining, and any agreement 1363 that which is reached shall supersede the previously existing 1364 procedure. All public employees shall have the right to a fair 1365 and equitable grievance procedure administered without regard to 1366 membership or nonmembership in any employee organization, except 1367 that bargaining agents may certified employee organizations 1368 shall not be required to process grievances for public employees 1369 who are not members of the employee organization. A public 1370 career service employee may use shall have the option of 1371 utilizing the civil service appeal procedure, an unfair labor 1372 practice procedure, or a grievance procedure established under 1373 this section, but may not avail such employee is precluded from 1374 availing himself or herself of to more than one of these 1375 procedures. 1376 Section 16.âSubsections (1) through (4) of section 447.403, 1377 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1378 447.403âResolution of impasses.â 1379 (1)âIf, after a reasonable period of negotiation concerning 1380 the terms and conditions of employment to be incorporated in a 1381 collective bargaining agreement, a dispute exists between a 1382 public employer and a bargaining agent, either party may declare 1383 an impasse by providing written notification shall be deemed to 1384 have occurred when one of the parties so declares in writing to 1385 the other party and to the commission. When an impasse occurs, 1386 the public employer or the bargaining agent, or both parties 1387 acting jointly, may use appoint, or secure the services 1388 appointment of, a mediator to assist in the resolution of the 1389 impasse. If the Governor is the public employer or for an 1390 impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095, a no mediator may not 1391 shall be appointed. 1392 (2)(a)âIf a no mediator is not used under subsection (1) 1393 appointed, or upon the request of either party, the commission 1394 must shall appoint, and submit all unresolved issues to, a 1395 special magistrate acceptable to both parties. If the parties 1396 are unable to agree on the appointment of a special magistrate, 1397 the commission must shall appoint, in its discretion, a 1398 qualified special magistrate. However, if the parties agree in 1399 writing to waive the appointment of a special magistrate, the 1400 parties may proceed directly to resolution of the impasse by the 1401 legislative body pursuant to paragraph (4)(d). Nothing in this 1402 section precludes the parties from using the services of a 1403 mediator at any time during the conduct of collective 1404 bargaining. 1405 (b)âIf the Governor is the public employer, a no special 1406 magistrate may not shall be appointed. The parties must may 1407 proceed directly to the Legislature for resolution of the 1408 impasse pursuant to paragraph (4)(d). 1409 (c)âFor an impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), the 1410 parties must agree on a special magistrate and submit the 1411 agreed-upon name to the commission within 5 calendar days after 1412 the declaration of impasse. Within 2 business days after the 1413 submission of the special magistrateâs name, the commission must 1414 appoint the agreed-upon special magistrate. If the parties do 1415 not submit the name of an agreed-upon special magistrate to the 1416 commission within 5 calendar days after the declaration of 1417 impasse, the commission must appoint a special magistrate of its 1418 choosing within 5 calendar days after the partiesâ deadline to 1419 submit the name of the agreed-upon special magistrate. Within 5 1420 calendar days after the special magistrate is appointed, each 1421 party must submit a list of issues at impasse to the special 1422 magistrate and serve a copy of the list on the other party at 1423 the same time. 1424 (3)âThe special magistrate shall hold a hearing hearings in 1425 order to define the area or areas of dispute, to determine facts 1426 relating to the dispute, and to render a decision on any and all 1427 unresolved contract issues. The hearing must hearings shall be 1428 held at a time, date, and place times, dates, and places to be 1429 established by the special magistrate in accordance with rules 1430 adopted promulgated by the commission. For an impasse declared 1431 pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), a hearing must be held within 20 1432 calendar days after the parties submit the list of issues at 1433 impasse to the special magistrate. The special magistrate may 1434 shall be empowered to administer oaths and issue subpoenas on 1435 behalf of the parties to the dispute or on his or her own 1436 behalf. Within 15 calendar days after the close of the final 1437 hearing, or 7 calendar days after the close of the hearing for 1438 an impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), the special 1439 magistrate shall submit transmit his or her recommended decision 1440 to the commission and to the representatives of both parties by 1441 any method of service agreed to by the parties which establishes 1442 proof of delivery registered mail, return receipt requested. 1443 Such recommended decision must shall be discussed by the 1444 parties, and each recommendation of the special magistrate is 1445 shall be deemed approved by both parties unless specifically 1446 rejected by either party by written notice filed with the 1447 commission within 20 calendar days, or 10 calendar days for an 1448 impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), after the date the 1449 party received the special magistrateâs recommended decision. 1450 The written notice must shall include a statement of the cause 1451 for each rejection and shall be served upon the other party at 1452 the same time as it is filed with the commission. 1453 (4)âIf either the public employer or the bargaining agent 1454 employee organization does not accept, in whole or in part, the 1455 recommended decision of the special magistrate, all of the 1456 following procedures apply: 1457 (a)âThe chief executive officer of the governmental entity 1458 involved must shall, within 10 calendar days after rejection of 1459 a recommendation of the special magistrate, submit to the 1460 legislative body of the governmental entity involved a copy of 1461 the findings of fact and recommended decision of the special 1462 magistrate, together with the chief executive officerâs 1463 recommendations for settling the disputed impasse issues. The 1464 chief executive officer must shall also submit transmit his or 1465 her recommendations to the bargaining agent at the same time as 1466 the recommendations are submitted to the legislative body. 1467 employee organization; 1468 (b)âWithin 10 calendar days after rejection of a 1469 recommendation of the special magistrate, the bargaining agent 1470 must employee organization shall submit its recommendations for 1471 settling the disputed impasse issues to such legislative body 1472 and to the chief executive officer.; 1473 (c)âThe legislative body or its a duly authorized committee 1474 must thereof shall forthwith conduct a public hearing at which 1475 the parties must shall be required to explain their positions 1476 with respect to the rejected recommendations of the special 1477 magistrate. For an impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), 1478 the legislative body must conduct the public hearing within 20 1479 calendar days after the parties submit their recommendations to 1480 the legislative body.; 1481 (d)âThereafter, the legislative body must shall take such 1482 action as it deems to be in the public interest, including the 1483 interest of the public employees involved, to resolve all 1484 disputed impasse issues. For an impasse declared pursuant to s. 1485 447.4095(2), the legislative body must take action within 10 1486 calendar days after the close of the public hearing.; and 1487 (e)1.âFollowing the resolution of the disputed impasse 1488 issues by the legislative body, the parties must shall reduce to 1489 writing an agreement which includes those issues agreed to by 1490 the parties and those disputed impasse issues resolved by the 1491 legislative bodyâs action taken pursuant to paragraph (d). For 1492 an impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), the parties must 1493 reduce the agreement to writing within 10 calendar days after 1494 the resolution of the disputed impasse issues by the legislative 1495 body. 1496 2.âThe agreement must shall be signed by the chief 1497 executive officer and the bargaining agent and shall be 1498 submitted to the public employer and to the public employees in 1499 who are members of the bargaining unit for ratification. For an 1500 impasse declared pursuant to s. 447.4095(2), the chief executive 1501 officer and the bargaining agent must sign the agreement within 1502 7 calendar days after the agreement is reduced to writing and 1503 must submit the agreement to the public employer and the 1504 bargaining unit for ratification within 10 calendar days after 1505 the agreement is signed. For an impasse declared pursuant to s. 1506 447.4095(2), the agreement must be signed, submitted, and 1507 ratified separately from other bargainable issues. 1508 3.âIf the such agreement is not ratified by all parties, 1509 pursuant to the provisions of s. 447.309, the legislative bodyâs 1510 action taken pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (d) shall 1511 take effect as of the date of such legislative bodyâs action for 1512 the remainder of the first fiscal year which was the subject of 1513 negotiations; however, the legislative bodyâs action may shall 1514 not take effect with respect to those disputed impasse issues 1515 that which establish the language of contractual provisions that 1516 which could have no effect in the absence of a ratified 1517 agreement, including, but not limited to, preambles, recognition 1518 clauses, and duration clauses. 1519 Section 17.âSection 447.405, Florida Statutes, is amended 1520 to read: 1521 447.405âFactors to be considered by the special 1522 magistrate.âThe special magistrate shall conduct the hearings 1523 and render recommended decisions with the objective of achieving 1524 a prompt, peaceful, and just settlement of disputes between the 1525 bargaining agents public employee organizations and the public 1526 employers. The factors, among others, to be given weight by the 1527 special magistrate in arriving at a recommended decision must 1528 shall include: 1529 (1)âComparison of the annual income of employment of the 1530 public employees in question with the annual income of 1531 employment maintained for the same or similar work of employees 1532 exhibiting like or similar skills under the same or similar 1533 working conditions in the local operating area involved. 1534 (2)âComparison of the annual income of employment of the 1535 public employees in question with the annual income of 1536 employment of public employees in similar public employee 1537 governmental bodies of comparable size within this the state. 1538 (3)âThe interest and welfare of the public. 1539 (4)âComparison of peculiarities of employment in regard to 1540 other trades or professions, specifically with respect to: 1541 (a)âHazards of employment. 1542 (b)âPhysical qualifications. 1543 (c)âEducational qualifications. 1544 (d)âIntellectual qualifications. 1545 (e)âJob training and skills. 1546 (f)âRetirement plans. 1547 (g)âSick leave. 1548 (h)âJob security. 1549 (5)âAvailability of funds. 1550 Section 18.âSection 447.4095, Florida Statutes, is amended 1551 to read: 1552 447.4095âFinancial urgency.â 1553 (1)âIn the event of a financial urgency requiring 1554 modification of an agreement, the chief executive officer or his 1555 or her representative and the bargaining agent or its 1556 representative shall meet as soon as possible to negotiate the 1557 impact of the financial urgency. If after a reasonable period of 1558 negotiation, which may shall not exceed 14 calendar days, a 1559 dispute exists between the public employer and the bargaining 1560 agent, an impasse is shall be deemed to have occurred, and one 1561 of the parties must shall so declare in writing to the other 1562 party and to the commission. The parties must shall then proceed 1563 to follow the requirements under pursuant to the provisions of 1564 s. 447.403. An unfair labor practice charge may shall not be 1565 filed during the 14 calendar days during which negotiations are 1566 occurring under pursuant to this section. 1567 (2)âFor the purposes of this section, the implementation of 1568 appropriations to local governments by the Legislature which are 1569 specifically directed in law to be disbursed as salaries to 1570 employees of local governments is considered a financial 1571 urgency. If the use of funding appropriated by the Legislature 1572 to local governments is restricted to salaries and associated 1573 costs of such salaries and the implementation of such 1574 appropriations will require modification of an agreement, the 1575 chief executive officer or his or her representative and the 1576 bargaining agent or its representative must meet within 15 1577 calendar days after the effective date of the appropriation to 1578 negotiate the impact of the financial urgency. If, 30 calendar 1579 days after the effective date of the appropriation, a dispute 1580 exists between the public employer and the bargaining agent as 1581 to the impact of the financial urgency, one of the parties must, 1582 within 2 business days, declare an impasse in writing to the 1583 other party and to the commission. The parties must then proceed 1584 to follow the requirements under s. 447.403. An unfair labor 1585 practice charge may not be filed during the 30-day period of 1586 negotiations or while the parties are proceeding through the 1587 resulting impasse process. This subsection does not apply to 1588 public employees in public safety units. 1589 Section 19.âParagraphs (c) and (f) of subsection (1) and 1590 subsection (2) of section 447.501, Florida Statutes, are 1591 amended, and paragraph (g) is added to subsection (1) of that 1592 section, to read: 1593 447.501âUnfair labor practices.â 1594 (1)âPublic employers or their agents or representatives are 1595 prohibited from: 1596 (c)âRefusing to bargain collectively, failing to bargain 1597 collectively in good faith, or refusing to sign a final 1598 agreement agreed upon with the certified bargaining agent for 1599 the public employees in the bargaining unit. 1600 (f)âRefusing to discuss grievances in good faith pursuant 1601 to the terms of the collective bargaining agreement with either 1602 the certified bargaining agent for the public employee or the 1603 employee involved. 1604 (g)âFailing to provide to any registered employee 1605 organization or any petitioning public employee who is seeking 1606 to support, oppose, or intervene in the certification, 1607 recertification, or decertification of a bargaining agent equal 1608 access to the public employerâs facilities and its internal 1609 means of communication for those purposes. The public employer 1610 must provide such equal access from the date of the filing of a 1611 petition pursuant to s. 447.307 or s. 447.308 until the final 1612 resolution of the petition. 1613 (2)âAn A public employee organization or anyone acting on 1614 in its behalf or its officers, representatives, agents, or 1615 members are prohibited from: 1616 (a)âInterfering with, restraining, or coercing public 1617 employees in the exercise of any rights guaranteed them under 1618 this part or interfering with, restraining, or coercing 1619 managerial employees by reason of their performance of job 1620 duties or other activities undertaken in the interests of the 1621 public employer. 1622 (b)âCausing or attempting to cause a public employer to 1623 discriminate against a public an employee because of such the 1624 employeeâs membership or nonmembership in an employee 1625 organization or attempting to cause the public employer to 1626 violate any of the provisions of this part. 1627 (c)âRefusing to bargain collectively or failing to bargain 1628 collectively in good faith with a public employer. 1629 (d)âDiscriminating against a public an employee because he 1630 or she has signed or filed an affidavit, a petition, or a 1631 complaint or given any information or testimony in any 1632 proceedings provided for in this part. 1633 (e)âParticipating in a strike against the public employer 1634 by instigating or supporting, in any positive manner, a strike. 1635 A person who violates Any violation of this paragraph is shall 1636 subject the violator to the penalties provided in this part. 1637 (f)âInstigating or advocating support, in any positive 1638 manner, for an employee organizationâs activities from high 1639 school or grade school students or students in institutions of 1640 higher learning. 1641 Section 20.âSubsection (1) of section 447.503, Florida 1642 Statutes, is amended to read: 1643 447.503âCharges of unfair labor practices.âIt is the intent 1644 of the Legislature that the commission act as expeditiously as 1645 possible to settle disputes regarding alleged unfair labor 1646 practices. To this end, violations of the provisions of s. 1647 447.501 shall be remedied by the commission in accordance with 1648 the following procedures and in accordance with chapter 120; 1649 however, to the extent that chapter 120 is inconsistent with the 1650 provisions of this section, the procedures contained in this 1651 section shall govern: 1652 (1)âA proceeding to remedy a violation of the provisions of 1653 s. 447.501 must shall be initiated by the filing of a charge 1654 with the commission by a public an employer, a public employee, 1655 or an employee organization, or any combination thereof, whose 1656 substantial interests will be affected as referenced in chapter 1657 120. Such a charge must shall contain a clear and concise 1658 statement of facts constituting the alleged unfair labor 1659 practice, including the names of all individuals involved in the 1660 alleged unfair labor practice, and include specific reference to 1661 the provisions of s. 447.501 alleged to have been violated, and 1662 such other relevant information as the commission may by rule 1663 require or allow. Service of the charge must shall be made upon 1664 each named respondent at the time of filing with the commission. 1665 The charge must be accompanied by sworn statements and 1666 documentary evidence sufficient to establish a prima facie 1667 violation of the applicable unfair labor practice provision. 1668 Such supporting evidence is not to be attached to the charge and 1669 is to be furnished only to the commission. 1670 Section 21.âSubsections (2) through (5) and paragraph (a) 1671 of subsection (6) of section 447.507, Florida Statutes, are 1672 amended to read: 1673 447.507âViolation of strike prohibition; penalties.â 1674 (2)âIf a public employee, a group of public employees, an 1675 employee organization, or any officer, agent, or representative 1676 of any employee organization engages in a strike in violation of 1677 s. 447.505, either the commission or any public employer whose 1678 public employees are involved or whose public employees may be 1679 affected by the strike may file suit to enjoin the strike in the 1680 circuit court having proper jurisdiction and proper venue of 1681 such actions under the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure and 1682 Florida Statutes. The circuit court shall conduct a hearing, 1683 with notice to the commission and to all interested parties, at 1684 the earliest practicable time. If the plaintiff makes a prima 1685 facie showing that a violation of s. 447.505 is in progress or 1686 that there is a clear, real, and present danger that such a 1687 strike is about to commence, the circuit court must shall issue 1688 a temporary injunction enjoining the strike. Upon final hearing, 1689 the circuit court shall either make the injunction permanent or 1690 dissolve it. 1691 (3)âIf an injunction to enjoin a strike issued pursuant to 1692 this section is not promptly complied with, on the application 1693 of the plaintiff, the circuit court must shall immediately 1694 initiate contempt proceedings against those who appear to be in 1695 violation. An employee organization found to be in contempt of 1696 court for violating an injunction against a strike shall be 1697 fined an amount deemed appropriate by the court. In determining 1698 the appropriate fine, the court shall objectively consider the 1699 extent of lost services and the particular nature and position 1700 of the public employee group in violation. A In no event shall 1701 the fine may not exceed $30,000 $5,000. Each officer, agent, or 1702 representative of an employee organization found to be in 1703 contempt of court for violating an injunction against a strike 1704 shall be fined at least $300, but not more than $600, not less 1705 than $50 nor more than $100 for each calendar day that the 1706 violation is in progress. 1707 (4)âAn employee organization is shall be liable for any 1708 damages that which might be suffered by a public employer as a 1709 result of a violation of the provisions of s. 447.505 by the 1710 employee organization or its representatives, officers, or 1711 agents. The circuit court having jurisdiction over such actions 1712 may is empowered to enforce judgments against employee 1713 organizations in the amount deemed appropriate by the court in 1714 accordance with this section. An action may not, as defined in 1715 this part, by attachment or garnishment of union initiation fees 1716 or dues which are to be deducted or checked off by public 1717 employers. No action shall be maintained pursuant to this 1718 subsection until all proceedings that which were pending before 1719 the commission at the time of the strike or that which were 1720 initiated within 30 days after of the strike have been finally 1721 adjudicated or otherwise disposed of. In determining the amount 1722 of damages, if any, to be awarded to the public employer, the 1723 trier of fact shall take into consideration any action or 1724 inaction by the public employer or its agents that provoked or 1725 tended to provoke the strike by the public employees. The trier 1726 of fact shall also take into consideration any damages that 1727 might have been recovered by the public employer under 1728 subparagraph (6)(a)4. 1729 (5)âIf the commission, after a hearing on notice conducted 1730 according to rules adopted promulgated by the commission, 1731 determines that a public an employee has violated s. 447.505, it 1732 may order the termination of such employeeâs his or her 1733 employment by the public employer. Notwithstanding any other 1734 provision of law, a person knowingly violating s. 447.505 the 1735 provision of said section may, subsequent to such violation, be 1736 appointed, reappointed, employed, or reemployed as a public 1737 employee, but only upon the following conditions: 1738 (a)âSuch person shall be on probation for a period of 18 1739 months after following his or her appointment, reappointment, 1740 employment, or reemployment, during which period he or she shall 1741 serve without permanent status and at the pleasure of the agency 1742 head. 1743 (b)âHis or her compensation may not in no event exceed the 1744 compensation that received immediately before prior to the time 1745 of the violation. 1746 (c)âThe compensation of the person may not be increased 1747 until at least after the expiration of 1 year after from such 1748 appointment, reappointment, employment, or reemployment. 1749 (6)(a)âIf the commission determines that an employee 1750 organization has violated s. 447.505, it may: 1751 1.âIssue cease and desist orders as necessary to ensure 1752 compliance with its order. 1753 2.âSuspend or revoke the certification of the employee 1754 organization as the bargaining agent of such bargaining employee 1755 unit. 1756 3.âRevoke any requirement of the public employer to engage 1757 in membership the right of dues deduction for the and collection 1758 previously granted to said employee organization pursuant to s. 1759 447.303. 1760 4.âFine the organization up to $40,000 $20,000 for each 1761 calendar day of such violation or determine the approximate cost 1762 to the public due to each calendar day of the strike and fine 1763 the organization an amount equal to such cost, regardless of 1764 whether the fine exceeds $40,000, notwithstanding the fact that 1765 the fine may exceed $20,000 for each such calendar day. The 1766 fines so collected shall immediately accrue to the public 1767 employer and must shall be used by the public employer him or 1768 her to replace those services denied the public as a result of 1769 the strike. In determining the amount of damages, if any, to be 1770 awarded to the public employer, the commission must consider 1771 shall take into consideration any action or inaction by the 1772 public employer or its agents that provoked, or tended to 1773 provoke, the strike by the public employees. 1774 Section 22.âSection 447.509, Florida Statutes, is amended 1775 to read: 1776 447.509âOther unlawful acts; exceptions.â 1777 (1)âEmployee organizations, their members, agents, or 1778 representatives, or any persons acting on their behalf are 1779 hereby prohibited from: 1780 (a)âSoliciting public employees during working hours of any 1781 employee who is involved in the solicitation. 1782 (b)âDistributing literature during working hours in areas 1783 where the actual work of public employees is performed, such as 1784 offices, warehouses, schools, police stations, fire stations, 1785 and any similar public installations. This section may shall not 1786 be construed to prohibit the distribution of literature during 1787 the employeeâs lunch hour or in such areas not specifically 1788 devoted to the performance of the employeeâs official duties. 1789 (c)âInstigating or advocating support, in any positive 1790 manner, for an employee organizationâs activities from high 1791 school or grade school students during classroom time. 1792 (d)âOffering anything of value to a public officer as 1793 defined in s. 112.313(1) which the public officer is prohibited 1794 from accepting under s. 112.313(2). 1795 (e)âOffering any compensation, payment, or thing of value 1796 to a public officer as defined in s. 112.313(1) which the public 1797 officer is prohibited from accepting under s. 112.313(4). 1798 (2)âAn No employee organization may not shall directly or 1799 indirectly pay any fines or penalties assessed against 1800 individuals pursuant to the provisions of this part. 1801 (3)âPublic employers, their agents or representatives, or 1802 persons acting on their behalf may not provide any form of 1803 compensation or paid leave to a public employee, directly or 1804 indirectly, for the purpose of engaging in employee organization 1805 activities. 1806 (4)âNotwithstanding subsection (3), a public employee may 1807 do any of the following: 1808 (a)âBe granted time off without pay or benefits to engage 1809 in employee organization activities, provided that the public 1810 employer and the bargaining agent agree. An employee 1811 organization may compensate a public employee for engaging in 1812 employee organization activities. 1813 (b)âUse compensated personal leave, whether the leave is 1814 the public employeeâs or is voluntarily donated by other public 1815 employees in the bargaining unit, to engage in employee 1816 organization activities if: 1817 1.âThe leave is accrued at the same rate by similarly 1818 situated public employees in the bargaining unit without regard 1819 to membership in or participation with an employee organization. 1820 2.âThe public employee may freely choose the manner in 1821 which to use the leave. 1822 (c)âEngage in representational employee organization 1823 activities on behalf of the bargaining agent while in a duty 1824 status without loss of pay or benefits, provided that the public 1825 employer and the bargaining agent agree. 1826 (5)âNotwithstanding subsection (3), a public employer may 1827 provide compensation and benefits to a public employee for the 1828 purpose of engaging in employee organization activities if 1829 agreed to in the collective bargaining agreement and if the 1830 public employer is fully reimbursed by the employee organization 1831 for such compensation and benefits. 1832 (6)âSubsections (3) and (4) do not apply to public 1833 employees in public safety units. 1834 (7)âThe circuit courts of this state shall have 1835 jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this section by 1836 injunction and contempt proceedings, if necessary. A public 1837 employee who is convicted of a violation of any provision of 1838 this section may be discharged or otherwise disciplined by his 1839 or her public employer, notwithstanding further provisions of 1840 law, and notwithstanding the provisions of any collective 1841 bargaining agreement. 1842 Section 23.âSubsection (3) of section 110.114, Florida 1843 Statutes, is amended to read: 1844 110.114âEmployee wage deductions.â 1845 (3)âNotwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and 1846 (2), the deduction of an employeeâs membership dues deductions 1847 as defined in s. 447.203 s. 447.203(15) for an employee 1848 organization as defined in s. 447.203(11) shall be authorized or 1849 permitted only for an organization that has been certified 1850 pursuant to chapter 447 as the exclusive bargaining agent 1851 pursuant to chapter 447 for a unit of public state employees in 1852 which the employee is included. Such deductions are shall be 1853 subject to the provisions of s. 447.303. 1854 Section 24.âParagraph (w) of subsection (2) of section 1855 110.205, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1856 110.205âCareer service; exemptions.â 1857 (2)âEXEMPT POSITIONS.âThe exempt positions that are not 1858 covered by this part include the following: 1859 (w)âManagerial employees and, as defined in s. 447.203(4), 1860 confidential employees, as those terms are defined in s. 447.203 1861 s. 447.203(5), and supervisory employees who spend the majority 1862 of their time communicating with, motivating, training, and 1863 evaluating employees, and planning and directing employeesâ 1864 work, and who have the authority to hire, transfer, suspend, lay 1865 off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline 1866 subordinate employees or effectively recommend such action, 1867 including all employees serving as supervisors, administrators, 1868 and directors. Excluded are employees also designated as special 1869 risk or special risk administrative support and attorneys who 1870 serve as administrative law judges pursuant to s. 120.65 or for 1871 hearings conducted pursuant to s. 120.57(1)(a). Additionally, 1872 registered nurses licensed under chapter 464, dentists licensed 1873 under chapter 466, psychologists licensed under chapter 490 or 1874 chapter 491, nutritionists or dietitians licensed under part X 1875 of chapter 468, pharmacists licensed under chapter 465, 1876 psychological specialists licensed under chapter 491, physical 1877 therapists licensed under chapter 486, and speech therapists 1878 licensed under part I of chapter 468 are excluded, unless 1879 otherwise collectively bargained. 1880 Section 25.âSubsection (6) of section 112.3187, Florida 1881 Statutes, is amended to read: 1882 112.3187âAdverse action against employee for disclosing 1883 information of specified nature prohibited; employee remedy and 1884 relief.â 1885 (6)âTO WHOM INFORMATION DISCLOSED.âThe information 1886 disclosed under this section must be disclosed to any agency or 1887 federal government entity having the authority to investigate, 1888 police, manage, or otherwise remedy the violation or act, 1889 including, but not limited to, the Office of the Chief Inspector 1890 General, an agency inspector general or the employee designated 1891 as agency inspector general under s. 112.3189(1) or inspectors 1892 general under s. 20.055, the Florida Commission on Human 1893 Relations, and the whistle-blowerâs hotline created under s. 1894 112.3189. However, for disclosures concerning a local 1895 governmental entity, including any regional, county, or 1896 municipal entity, special district, community college district, 1897 or school district or any political subdivision of any of the 1898 foregoing, the information must be disclosed to a chief 1899 executive officer as defined in s. 447.203 s. 447.203(9) or 1900 other appropriate local official. 1901 Section 26.âSubsection (5) of section 121.031, Florida 1902 Statutes, is amended to read: 1903 121.031âAdministration of system; appropriation; oaths; 1904 actuarial studies; public records.â 1905 (5)âThe names and addresses of retirees are confidential 1906 and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) to the extent 1907 that no state or local governmental agency may provide the names 1908 or addresses of such persons in aggregate, compiled, or list 1909 form to any person except to a public agency engaged in official 1910 business. However, a state or local government agency may 1911 provide the names and addresses of retirees from that agency to 1912 a bargaining agent as defined in s. 447.203 s. 447.203(12) or to 1913 a retiree organization for official business use. Lists of names 1914 or addresses of retirees may be exchanged by public agencies, 1915 but such lists may shall not be provided to, or open for 1916 inspection by, the public. Any person may view or copy any 1917 individualâs retirement records at the Department of Management 1918 Services, one record at a time, or may obtain information by a 1919 separate written request for a named individual for which 1920 information is desired. 1921 Section 27.âSubsection (1) of section 447.02, Florida 1922 Statutes, is amended to read: 1923 447.02âDefinitions.âThe following terms, when used in this 1924 chapter, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this 1925 section: 1926 (1)âThe term âlabor organizationâ means any organization of 1927 employees or local or subdivision thereof, having within its 1928 membership residents of the state, whether incorporated or not, 1929 organized for the purpose of dealing with employers concerning 1930 hours of employment, rate of pay, working conditions, or 1931 grievances of any kind relating to employment and recognized as 1932 a unit of bargaining by one or more employers doing business in 1933 this state, except that an âemployee organization,â as defined 1934 in s. 447.203 s. 447.203(11), shall be included in this 1935 definition at such time as it seeks to register pursuant to s. 1936 447.305. 1937 Section 28.âSection 447.609, Florida Statutes, is amended 1938 to read: 1939 447.609âRepresentation in proceedings.âAny full-time 1940 employee or officer of any public employer or employee 1941 organization may represent his or her employer or any public 1942 employee in member of a bargaining unit in any proceeding 1943 authorized in this part, excluding the representation of any 1944 person or public employer in a court of law by a person who is 1945 not a licensed attorney. 1946 Section 29.âSubsection (2) of section 1011.60, Florida 1947 Statutes, is amended to read: 1948 1011.60âMinimum requirements of the Florida Education 1949 Finance Program.âEach district which participates in the state 1950 appropriations for the Florida Education Finance Program shall 1951 provide evidence of its effort to maintain an adequate school 1952 program throughout the district and shall meet at least the 1953 following requirements: 1954 (2)âMINIMUM TERM.âOperate all schools for a term of 180 1955 actual teaching days or the equivalent on an hourly basis as 1956 specified by rules of the State Board of Education each school 1957 year. The State Board of Education may prescribe procedures for 1958 altering, and, upon written application, may alter, this 1959 requirement during a national, state, or local emergency as it 1960 may apply to an individual school or schools in any district or 1961 districts if, in the opinion of the board, it is not feasible to 1962 make up lost days or hours, and the apportionment may, at the 1963 discretion of the Commissioner of Education and if the board 1964 determines that the reduction of school days or hours is caused 1965 by the existence of a bona fide emergency, be reduced for such 1966 district or districts in proportion to the decrease in the 1967 length of term in any such school or schools. A strike, as 1968 defined in s. 447.203 s. 447.203(6), by employees of the school 1969 district may not be considered an emergency. 1970 Section 30.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.